Nebraska, session 109, LB1031.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1031 LB1031
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) The Legislature shall appropriate one million five
hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2025-26 and one million five
hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2026-27 from the Hospital
Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Fund to the Department of Health
and Human Services for the medical assistance program to be used to
provide reimbursement to mental health providers who do not practice in a
hospital and who provide behavioral health services to medicaid-eligible
participants who are dually eligible beneficiaries that are eligible for
both medicaid and medicare. For dual eligible recipients, the higher
medicaid or medicare rate shall be paid for behavioral health services.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to sustain the medicaid
rates for mental health providers serving medicaid-eligible participants
who are dually eligible beneficiaries that are eligible for both medicaid
and medicare and who are receiving behavioral health services under the
medical assistance program.
-2-